New York, session 2025-2026, A5892.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 3342 of the public health law, as 2 amended by chapter 466 of the laws of 2024, is amended and a new subdi- 3 vision 2-a is added to read as follows: 4 2. An institutional dispenser may dispense controlled substances for 5 use off its premises only pursuant to a prescription, prepared and filed 6 in conformity with this title, provided, however, that, in an emergency 7 situation as defined by rule or regulation of the department, a practi- 8 tioner in a hospital without a full-time pharmacy may dispense 9 controlled substances to a patient in a hospital emergency room for use 10 off the premises of the institutional dispenser for a period not to 11 exceed twenty-four hours[, unless the federal drug enforcement adminis- 12 tration has authorized a longer time period for the purpose of initiat- 13 ing maintenance treatment, detoxification treatment, or both]. 14 2-a. A practitioner in any institutional dispenser may dispense 15 controlled substances as emergency treatment to a patient for use off 16 the premises of the institutional dispenser as authorized by the federal 17 drug enforcement administration for the purpose of initiating mainte- 18 nance treatment, detoxification treatment, or both. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07703-10-5 A. 5892--B 2 1 § 2. Section 3351 of the public health law, as added by chapter 878 of 2 the laws of 1972, subdivision 5 as amended by chapter 558 of the laws of 3 1999, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 3351. Dispensing for medical use. 1. Controlled substances may be 5 prescribed for, or administered or dispensed to an addict or habitual 6 user: 7 (a) during emergency medical treatment unrelated to abuse of 8 controlled substances; 9 (b) who is a bona fide patient suffering from an incurable and fatal 10 disease such as cancer or advanced tuberculosis; 11 (c) who is aged, infirm, or suffering from serious injury or illness 12 and the withdrawal from controlled substances would endanger the life or 13 impede or inhibit the recovery of such person. 14 2. Controlled substances may be ordered for use by an addict or habit- 15 ual user by a practitioner and administered by a practitioner or regis- 16 tered nurse to relieve acute withdrawal symptoms. 17 3. A practitioner may prescribe, administer, and dispense any schedule 18 III, IV, or V narcotic drug approved by the federal food and drug admin- 19 istration specifically for use in maintenance or detoxification treat- 20 ment to an addict or habitual user. 21 4. Methadone, or such other controlled substance designated by the 22 commissioner as appropriate for such use, may be ordered for use of an 23 addict by a practitioner and dispensed or administered by a practitioner 24 or [his] such practitioner's designated agent as interim treatment for 25 an addict [on a waiting list for admission to an authorized maintenance 26 program] while arrangements are being made for referral to treatment for 27 such addiction to controlled substances. 28 [4.] 5. Methadone, or such other controlled substance designated by 29 the commissioner as appropriate for such use, may be administered to an 30 addict by a practitioner or by [his] such practitioner's designated 31 agent acting under the direction and supervision of a practitioner, as 32 part of a [regime] regimen designed and intended to withdraw a patient 33 from addiction to controlled substances. 34 [5. Methadone] 6. Notwithstanding any other law and consistent with 35 federal requirements, methadone, or such other controlled substance 36 designated by the commissioner as appropriate for such use, may be 37 administered or dispensed directly to an addict by a practitioner or by 38 [his] such practitioner's designated agent acting under the direction 39 and supervision of a practitioner, as part of a substance abuse or chem- 40 ical dependence program approved pursuant to article [twenty-three or] 41 thirty-two of the mental hygiene law. 42 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 43 have become a law.